hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX UA Y      84
SFX UA 0      ski        [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      ska        [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      sku        [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skim       [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skih       [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skima      [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      ske        [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      sko        [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skoj       [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skom       [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skog       [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skoga      [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skome      [^ačšckg]
SFX UA 0      skomu      [^ačšckg]
SFX UA a      ski        a
SFX UA a      ska        a
SFX UA a      sku        a
SFX UA a      skim       a
SFX UA a      skih       a
SFX UA a      skima      a
SFX UA a      ske        a
SFX UA a      sko        a
SFX UA a      skoj       a
SFX UA a      skom       a
SFX UA a      skog       a
SFX UA a      skoga      a
SFX UA a      skome      a
SFX UA a      skomu      a
SFX UA 0      ki         [čš]
SFX UA 0      ka         [čš]
SFX UA 0      ku         [čš]
SFX UA 0      kim        [čš]
SFX UA 0      kih        [čš]
SFX UA 0      kima       [čš]
SFX UA 0      ke         [čš]
SFX UA 0      ko         [čš]
SFX UA 0      koj        [čš]
SFX UA 0      kom        [čš]
SFX UA 0      kog        [čš]
SFX UA 0      koga       [čš]
SFX UA 0      kome       [čš]
SFX UA 0      komu       [čš]
SFX UA k      čki        k
SFX UA k      čka        k
SFX UA k      čku        k
SFX UA k      čkim       k
SFX UA k      čkih       k
SFX UA k      čkima      k
SFX UA k      čke        k
SFX UA k      čko        k
SFX UA k      čkoj       k
SFX UA k      čkom       k
SFX UA k      čkog       k
SFX UA k      čkoga      k
SFX UA k      čkome      k
SFX UA k      čkomu      k
SFX UA c      čki        c
SFX UA c      čka        c
SFX UA c      čku        c
SFX UA c      čkim       c
SFX UA c      čkih       c
SFX UA c      čkima      c
SFX UA c      čke        c
SFX UA c      čko        c
SFX UA c      čkoj       c
SFX UA c      čkom       c
SFX UA c      čkog       c
SFX UA c      čkoga      c
SFX UA c      čkome      c
SFX UA c      čkomu      c
SFX UA g      ški        g
SFX UA g      ška        g
SFX UA g      šku        g
SFX UA g      škim       g
SFX UA g      ških       g
SFX UA g      škima      g
SFX UA g      ške        g
SFX UA g      ško        g
SFX UA g      škoj       g
SFX UA g      škom       g
SFX UA g      škog       g
SFX UA g      škoga      g
SFX UA g      škome      g
SFX UA g      škomu      g

SFX TZ Y      6
SFX TZ a      e          a
SFX TZ a      i          a
SFX TZ a      u          a
SFX TZ a      o          a
SFX TZ a      om         a
SFX TZ a      ama        a

SFX TY Y      5
SFX TY a      e          a
SFX TY a      i          a
SFX TY a      u          a
SFX TY a      o          a
SFX TY a      om         a

SFX TX Y      5
SFX TX a      e          a
SFX TX ka     ci         ka
SFX TX a      u          a
SFX TX a      o          a
SFX TX a      om         a


SFX TW Y      8
SFX TW a      e          a
SFX TW ka     ci         ka
SFX TW ga     zi         ga
SFX TW ha     si         ha
SFX TW a      u          a
SFX TW a      o          a
SFX TW a      om         a
SFX TW a      ama        a

SFX TV Y      9
SFX TV a      e          a
SFX TV a      i          a
SFX TV ka     ci         ka
SFX TV ga     zi         ga
SFX TV ha     si         ha
SFX TV a      u          a
SFX TV a      o          a
SFX TV a      om         a
SFX TV a      ama        a

SFX TU Y      9
SFX TU a      e          a
SFX TU a      i          a
SFX TU tka    ci         tka
SFX TU tka    tci        tka
SFX TU a      u          a
SFX TU a      o          a
SFX TU a      om         a
SFX TU tka    taka       tka
SFX TU a      ama        a

SFX TT Y      12
SFX TT lja    alja       lja
SFX TT ka     aka        ka
SFX TT ma     ama        ma
SFX TT ba     aba        ba
SFX TT ra     ara        ra
SFX TT la     ala        la
SFX TT na     ana        na
SFX TT va     ava        va
SFX TT ča     ača        ča
SFX TT ta     ata        ta
SFX TT nja    anja       nja
SFX TT ca     aca        ca

SFX TS Y      3
SFX TS ška    žaka       ška
SFX TS pka    baka       pka
SFX TS tka    daka       tka

SFX TR Y      9
SFX TR a      e          a
SFX TR a      i          a
SFX TR a      u          a
SFX TR a      om         a
SFX TR a      ama        a
SFX TR e      i          e
SFX TR e      ama        e
SFX TR i      e          i
SFX TR i      ima        i

SFX TQ Y      19
SFX TQ 0      ica        .
SFX TQ 0      ice        .
SFX TQ 0      ici        .
SFX TQ 0      icu        .
SFX TQ 0      icom       .
SFX TQ 0      icama      .
SFX TQ 0      ičin       .
SFX TQ 0      ičina      .
SFX TQ 0      ičinu      .
SFX TQ 0      ičini      .
SFX TQ 0      ičinim     .
SFX TQ 0      ičinih     .
SFX TQ 0      ičinima    .
SFX TQ 0      ičine      .
SFX TQ 0      ičino      .
SFX TQ 0      ičinog     .
SFX TQ 0      ičinoga    .
SFX TQ 0      ičinoj     .
SFX TQ 0      ičinom     .

SFX TP Y      17
SFX TP ik     ica        ik
SFX TP ik     ice        ik
SFX TP ik     ici        ik
SFX TP ik     icu        ik
SFX TP ik     icom       ik
SFX TP ik     icama      ik
SFX TP ik     ičin       ik
SFX TP ik     ičina      ik
SFX TP ik     ičinu      ik
SFX TP ik     ičini      ik
SFX TP ik     ičinim     ik
SFX TP ik     ičinih     ik
SFX TP ik     ičinima    ik
SFX TP ik     ičine      ik
SFX TP ik     ičino      ik
SFX TP ik     ičinoj     ik
SFX TP ik     ičinom     ik

SFX TO Y      19
SFX TO 0      ka         .
SFX TO 0      ke         .
SFX TO 0      ki         .
SFX TO 0      ku         .
SFX TO 0      ko         .
SFX TO 0      kom        .
SFX TO 0      kama       .
SFX TO 0      kin        .
SFX TO 0      kina       .
SFX TO 0      kinu       .
SFX TO 0      kini       .
SFX TO 0      kinim      .
SFX TO 0      kinih      .
SFX TO 0      kinima     .
SFX TO 0      kine       .
SFX TO 0      kino       .
SFX TO 0      kinoj      .
SFX TO 0      kinom      .
SFX TO 0      aka        .

SFX TN Y      18
SFX TN 0      inja       .
SFX TN 0      inje       .
SFX TN 0      inji       .
SFX TN 0      inju       .
SFX TN 0      injo       .
SFX TN 0      injom      .
SFX TN 0      injama     .
SFX TN 0      injin      .
SFX TN 0      injina     .
SFX TN 0      injinu     .
SFX TN 0      injini     .
SFX TN 0      injinim    .
SFX TN 0      injinih    .
SFX TN 0      injinima   .
SFX TN 0      injine     .
SFX TN 0      injino     .
SFX TN 0      injinoj    .
SFX TN 0      injinom    .

SFX TM Y      7
SFX TM 0      ija        .
SFX TM 0      ije        .
SFX TM 0      iji        .
SFX TM 0      iju        .
SFX TM 0      ijo        .
SFX TM 0      ijom       .
SFX TM 0      ijama      .

SFX TL Y      10
SFX TL 0      i          .
SFX TL 0      ima        .
SFX TL st     šću        st
SFX TL št     šću        št
SFX TL l      lju        l
SFX TL p      plju       p
SFX TL v      vlju       v
SFX TL đ      đu         đ
SFX TL ž      žju        ž
SFX TL it     iću        it

SFX TK Y      4
SFX TK e      a          e
SFX TK e      ama        e
SFX TK an     ni         an
SFX TK an     nima       an

SFX TJ Y      4
SFX TJ a      e          a
SFX TJ a      oj         a
SFX TJ a      u          a
SFX TJ a      om         a

SFX TI Y      6
SFX TI a      e          a
SFX TI a      i          a
SFX TI a      u          a
SFX TI a      o          a
SFX TI a      om         a
SFX TI a      ima        a

SFX TH Y 4
SFX TH 0 -a .
SFX TH 0 -u .
SFX TH 0 -e .
SFX TH 0 -om .

SFX TG Y 13
SFX TG 0 -ov .
SFX TG 0 -ovi .
SFX TG 0 -ove .
SFX TG 0 -ovih .
SFX TG 0 -ovim .
SFX TG 0 -ovima .
SFX TG 0 -ova .
SFX TG 0 -ovu .
SFX TG 0 -ovom .
SFX TG 0 -ovog .
SFX TG 0 -ovoga .
SFX TG 0 -ovome .
SFX TG 0 -ovomu .

SFX TF Y 13
SFX TF 0 -ev .
SFX TF 0 -evi .
SFX TF 0 -eve .
SFX TF 0 -evih .
SFX TF 0 -evim .
SFX TF 0 -evima .
SFX TF 0 -eva .
SFX TF 0 -evu .
SFX TF 0 -evom .
SFX TF 0 -evog .
SFX TF 0 -evoga .
SFX TF 0 -evome .
SFX TF 0 -evomu .

AF VOUJUA	# 221
AF VOUJTQ	# 222
AF VOUJTQUA	# 223
AF VOUJTP	# 226
AF VOUJTPUA	# 227
AF VOUJTO	# 228
AF VOUJTOUA	# 229
AF VOUJTOTMUA	# 231
AF VOUJTN	# 232
AF VOUJTNUA	# 233
AF VOUJTM	# 234
AF VOUJTMUA	# 235
AF VOUA	# 238
AF VOUATM	# 239
AF VOTMUA	# 241
AF TZ	# 360
AF TZUH	# 364
AF TZUA	# 365
AF TZTT	# 368
AF TZTTUI	# 369
AF TY	# 372
AF TYUI	# 373
AF TYUH	# 374
AF TYTTUI	# 376
AF TX	# 377
AF TW	# 378
AF TV	# 380
AF TVTT	# 383
AF TVTTUI	# 384
AF TVTS	# 385
AF TU	# 386
AF TR	# 387
AF TRUH	# 389
AF TL	# 392
AF TK	# 394
AF TJ	# 395
AF TITTUI	# 396
AF TH	# 397
AF THTGTETC	# 402
AF THTG	# 411
