hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.dic
Amerika/377
Anica/374
Antarktika/377
atelijer/238
austrofob/234
Babilonka/369
balistika/378
Bastilja/372
Bavarska/395
biofizika/377
Biserka/376
BMW/397
bodul/229
bojazan/394
bojažljivica/389
bravar/235
Brodsko-posavska/395
budak/232
buntovnik/227
CGI/397
cijeđ/392
cikloida/360
citozin/238
cvjećar/223
čakavština/372
čestitka/386
čudotvorka/369
Delnice/394
devetnaestogodišnjak/232
dinamograf/239
DJ/397
djevojčica/389
djevojka/384
dogmatika/378
drška/385
Dubrovačko-neretvanska/395
dužnosnik/227
DVD/397
ekscesivnost/392
ekstrakcija/365
Emina/373
faktograf/235
fantastika/378
farizej/229
fizika/377
general/223
geofizika/377
gizdavica/387
gostionica/360
grabljice/394
grandoman/235
gvanin/238
harambašica/389
HDS/402
HDSSB/402
HDZ/402
HNS/402
hranidba/368
HSLS/402
HSS/402
IBM/397
ironičar/228
isprika/378
izvođač/223
izvornost/392
jaslice/394
Jasminka/373
jedanaestogodišnjak/232
Ješua/377
jetra/396
kapelan/231
kapucin/221
klepka/383
kolijevka/383
konzekvenca/360
Koprivničko-križevačka/395
kupelj/392
kvintet/238
laburist/222
Lidija/373
logičar/229
ljepotica/389
malodobnik/227
Mostarka/369
motka/380
MUP/397
muzika/377
najmodavka/369
naoblaka/378
naočale/394
nazoviučenjak/233
Nebraska/395
neuropat/235
noć/392
novčar/229
Novska/395
objavitelj/222
OPG/411
opsadnik/226
pašinica/389
petnaestogodišnjak/232
petrolejka/383
Pišta/372
pjevač/223
Plitvice/394
podnositelj/223
podrška/385
potka/368
potkovica/360
povjerenik/227
povlaka/378
predbrojka/380
pregršt/392
pribilješka/385
pripovijetka/385
profiter/229
pustinjak/233
razdjelnik/227
rešetka/386
rožica/387
sceničnost/392
SDP/402
SDSS/402
selektor/223
senzibilizacija/365
Sisačko-moslavačka/395
skitnica/364
skrižaljka/383
snaga/378
spirine/394
spojka/383
srebrnar/229
šesnaestogodišnjak/232
školjčica/387
škrebetaljka/383
taljige/394
Tasmanija/372
telefon/241
Trešnjevka/377
učenik/227
urvina/365
uš/392
vikar/223
Viking/233
Virovitičko-podravska/395
vojska/383
volonter/229
zabilješka/385
zadrška/385
zagonetka/386
zapisničar/229
zaprška/385
zatočenik/227
zipka/385
žega/378
